New Jersey, session 221, S3039.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Ground-harvested fruit means fruit that has fallen or been dropped or blown from a tree, bush, or stem, or that otherwise lays on the ground, at the time of harvest. Value-added product means an agricultural commodity or product that has undergone a change in physical state, was produced in a manner that enhances its value, as demonstrated through a business plan showing the enhanced value, is physically segregated in a manner that enhances its value, or is aggregated and marketed as a locally produced agricultural food product, and which, as a result of such change in physical state or such manner of production, marketing, or segregation, results in an expanded customer base for the agricultural commodity or product and enables the producer to retain a greater portion of the revenue derived from the marketing, processing, or physical segregation of the agricultural commodity or product. b.    Notwithstanding any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a farmer or other person shall be authorized to: (1)   use ground-harvested fruit to produce alcohol, cider, baked goods, or other value-added products for sale or distribution in this State, provided that the final value-added products are pasteurized or otherwise appropriately prepared or treated, prior to sale or distribution, as may be necessary to destroy microorganisms that may cause disease, spoilage, or undesirable fermentation; and (2)   sell or distribute ground-harvested fruit to another person for use in the production or processing of food or other value-added products, which use comports with the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection. c.     A value-added product that incorporates ground-harvested fruit, is sold or distributed, offered for sale or distribution, or possessed for the purposes of sale or distribution, as a food product in this State, and has not been pasteurized or otherwise appropriately prepared or treated in a manner that destroys the microorganisms contained therein, as required by subsection b. of this section, shall be subject to confiscation, condemnation, and destruction or disposal by the Department of Health, in accordance with the provisions of R.S.24:4-1 et seq. 2.    The Department of Agriculture and the Department of Health, in consultation, shall adopt rules and regulations, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), as may be necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.